Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,107
Equity securities insider trading; statement of certain owners; form; required; filing.

Every domestic stock insurer shall file with the Director of Insurance, on such forms as the director may require, a separate statement for each person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of more than ten percent of any class of any equity security of such insurer, and for each person who is a director or an officer of such insurer. The statement of the amount of all equity securities of such insurer, directly or indirectly owned by the individuals enumerated above, shall be filed with the director on or before January 1, 1970; within ten days after a person becomes an officer, director, or such beneficial owner; and within ten days after the close of each calendar month thereafter, if there has been a change in such ownership.

Laws 1965, c. 248, § 1, p. 702;

Laws 1969, c. 368, § 1, p. 1307.